Utah statutes.
10-7-4.   Water supply -- Acquisition -- Condemnation -- Protest -- Special
election -- Determination of just compensation.
(1)  The board of commissioners, city council or board of trustees of any city
or town may acquire, purchase or lease all or any part of any water,
waterworks system, water supply or property connected therewith, and whenever
the governing body of a city or town shall deem it necessary for the public
good such city or town may bring condemnation proceedings to acquire the same;
provided, that if within 30 days after the passage and publication of a
resolution or ordinance for the purchase or lease or condemnation herein
provided for one-third of the resident taxpayers of the city or town, as shown
by the assessment roll, shall protest against the purchase, lease or
condemnation proceedings contemplated, such proposed purchase, lease or
condemnation shall be referred to a special election, and if confirmed by a
majority vote thereat, shall take effect; otherwise it shall be void.
(2)  In all condemnation proceedings the value of land affected by the taking
must be considered in connection with the water or water rights taken for the
purpose of supplying the city or town or the inhabitants thereof with water.
(3)  In determining just compensation in a condemnation proceeding under this
section in a municipality located in a county of the first class where a
determination of market value of what is proposed to be taken is impractical
because there is no meaningful market for what is proposed to be taken, the
value shall be:
(a)  presumed to be the amount the owner paid to acquire ownership of what is
proposed to be taken, as adjusted by a change in value due to post-acquisition
deterioration and any other factor reasonably and equitably bearing on the
value of what is proposed to be taken; and
(b)  determined by applying equitable considerations including:
(i)  whether the owner will be unjustly enriched;
(ii)  whether the owner acquired the property by exaction or similar method;
and
(iii)  the extent to which the consideration the owner provided in acquiring
the property consists of an obligation to maintain the property and whether
that obligation will be assumed by the municipality because of the
condemnation.
(4)  This section may not be construed to provide the basis for a
municipality's condemnation of a political subdivision of the state or of the
political subdivision's property or holdings.
